src/morphology/stems/altstem-nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_HYNTTEET

0:e       N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tee   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:te    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:et    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:tee   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:te    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:te    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:te    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:te    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tee     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:te      N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:te      N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_PUKEET

0:ke    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:ke   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:ke   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:ke   N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ke   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ke   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kee N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ke  N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:ke  N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_KUULOKKEET

0:ke    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:ke   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:ke   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:ke   N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ke   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ke   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kee N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ke  N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:ke  N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_VAATTEET

0:te    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:te   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:te   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:te   N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:te   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tee N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:te  N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:te  N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_PEITTEET

0:te    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:te    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:te    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:te    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:te    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tee     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:te      N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:te      N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_SUHTEET

0:te    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:te   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:te   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:te   N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:de   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:de   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tee N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:te  N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:te  N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_LAUTEET

0:te    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:te   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:te   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:te   N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:de   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:de   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tee N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:te  N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:te  N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_SÄTEET

0:te    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:te    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:te    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:te    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:te    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:de       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tee     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:te      N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:te      N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_SITEET

0:te    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:te    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:te    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:te    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:te    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:de       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tee     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:te      N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:te      N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_TARPEET

0:pe    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:pe   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:pe   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:pe   N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:pe   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:pe   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ve   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:pee N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:pe  N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:pe  N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_HIUTALEET

0       N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:e    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:e    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0       N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0       N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:e    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:e    N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0       N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:e    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:e    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e      N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e      N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ee     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0       N_COMPOUND_TEN ;
0       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:e      N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:e      N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_ALKEET

0:ke    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:ke    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:ke    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:ke    N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ke    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ke    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:je       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kee     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ke      N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:ke      N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_PERKEET

0:ke    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:je       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kee     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ke      N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:ke      N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_POJAT










0:ik   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:j   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ik   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:ik   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ika   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:ik   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ika   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ja   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ik   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:ika   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
